ro-RO: Nuanță machiaj: Bej; Albastru; Maro; Bej intens; Maro intens; Auriu; Verde; Bej deschis; Auriu deschis; Corai deschis; Roz deschis; Roz auriu deschis; Bej mediu; Auriu mediu; Corai mediu; Roz mediu; Roz auriu deschis; Multicolor; Natural; Piersică; Roz; Violet; Roșu; Roz auriu; Argintiu; Bej cafeniu; Maro cafeniu; Alb; Galben; Altele
cs: Odstín make-upu: Béžová; Modrá; Hnědá; Silně tmavě béžová; Silně tmavě hnědá; Zlatá; Zelená; Světle béžová; Světle zlatá; Světle broskvová; Světle růžová; Světle růžově zlatá; Středně béžová; Středně zlatá; Středně broskvová; Středně růžová; Středně růžově zlatá; Vícebarevná; Přírodní; Broskvová; Růžová; Purpurová; Červená; Růžově zlatá; Stříbrná; Lehce světle béžová; Lehce světle hnědá; Bílá; Žlutá; Jiné
nb: Sminketone: Beige; Blå; Brun; Dyp beige; Dyp brun; Gull; Grønn; Lys beige; Lys gull; Lys fersken; Lyserosa; Lys rosegull; Mellombeige; Mellomgull; Mellomfersken; Mellomrosa; Mellomroségull; Flerfarget; Naturlig; Fersken; Rosa; Lilla; Rød; Roségull; Sølv; Gyllenbeige; Gyllenbrun; Hvit; Gul; Annet
lt-LT: Makiažo atspalvis: Smėlinė; Mėlyna; Ruda; Tamsi smėlinė; Tamsiai ruda; Auksinė; Žalia; Šviesi smėlinė; Šviesiai auksinė; Šviesiai persikinė; Šviesiai rožinė; Šviesiai rožinio aukso; Vidutinio tamsumo smėlinė; Vidutinio tamsumo auksinė; Vidutinio tamsumo persikinė; Vidutinio tamsumo rožinė; Vidutinio tamsumo rožinio aukso; Daugiaspalvis; Natūralus; Persikinė; Rožinė; Violetinė; Raudona; Rožinio aukso; Sidabrinė; Tamsi smėlinė; Vidutinio tamsumo ruda; Balta; Geltona; Kita
sk-SK: Odtieň make-upu: Béžový; Modrý; Hnedý; Sýto béžový; Sýto hnedý; Zlato; Zelený; Svetlo béžový; Svetlo zlatý; Svetlá broskyňový; Svetlo ružový; Svetlo ružové zlato; Stredne béžový; Stredne zlatý; Stredne broskyňový; Stredne ružový; Stredne ružové zlato; Viacfarebný; Prirodzený; Broskyňový; Ružový; Fialový; Červený; Ružové zlato; Strieborný; Béžovohnedý; Opálený hnedý; Biely; Žltý; Iné
zh-CN: 色号: 茶色; 蓝色; 棕色; 深茶色; 深棕色; 金色; 绿色; 浅茶色; 浅金色; 浅桃红色; 浅粉色; 浅玫瑰金; 中茶色; 中金色; 中桃红色; 中粉色; 中玫瑰金; 多色; 天然; 桃红色; 粉红色; 紫色; 红色; 玫瑰金; 银色; 棕茶色; 棕褐色; 白色; 黄色; 其他
bg-BG: Тон за грим: Бежово; Синьо; Кафяво; Наситено бежово; Наситено кафяво; Златно; Зелено; Светло бежово; Светло злато; Светла праскова; Светло розово; Светло розово злато; Средно бежово; Средно злато; Средна праскова; Средно розово; Средно розово злато; Многоцветно; Естествено; Праскова; Розово; Лилаво; Червено; Розово злато; Сребро; Бежов тен; Кафяв тен; Бяло; Жълто; Други
el: Απόχρωση μακιγιάζ: Μπεζ; Μπλε; Καφέ; Βαθύ μπεζ; Βαθύ καφέ; Χρυσό; Πράσινο; Ανοιχτό μπεζ; Ανοιχτό χρυσό; Ελαφρύ ροδακινί; Ανοιχτό ροζ; Ανοιχτό ροζ χρυσό; Μεσαίο μπεζ; Μεσαίο χρυσό; Μέτριο ροδακινί; Μεσαίο ροζ; Μεσαίο ροζ χρυσό; Πολυχρωμία; Φυσικό; Ροδάκινο; Ροζ; Μωβ; Κόκκινο; Ροζ χρυσό; Ασημί; Μπρονζέ μπεζ; Μπρονζέ καφέ; Λευκό; Κίτρινο; Άλλο
nl: Make-uptint: Beige; Blauw; Bruin; Diepbeige; Diepbruin; Goud; Groen; Lichtbeige; Lichtgoud; Licht perzik; Lichtroze; Licht roségoud; Medium beige; Medium goud; Medium perzik; Medium roze; Medium roségoud; Meerkleurig; Natuurlijk; Perzik; Roze; Paars; Rood; Roségoud; Zilver; Geelbruin-beige; Geelbruin; Wit; Geel; Andere
es: Tono de maquillaje: Beige; Azul; Marrón; Beige intenso; Marrón intenso; Dorado; Verde; Beige claro; Dorado claro; Melocotón claro; Rosa claro; Oro rosa claro; Beige medio; Dorado medio; Melocotón medio; Rosa medio; Oro rosa medio; Multicolor; Natural; Melocotón; Rosa; Púrpura; Rojo; Oro rosa; Plateado; Beige tostado; Marrón tostado; Blanco; Amarillo; Otros
th: เฉดสีแต่งหน้า: สีเบจ; น้ำเงิน; สีน้ำตาล; สีเบจเข้ม; สีน้ำตาลเข้ม; โกลด์; สีเขียว; สีเบจอ่อน; สีทองอ่อน; สีพีชอ่อน; สีชมพูอ่อน; สีทองอมชมพูอ่อน; สีเบจปานกลาง; สีทองปานกลาง; สีพีชปานกลาง; สีชมพูปานกลาง; สีทองอมชมพูปานกลาง; หลายสี; เป็นธรรมชาติ; ลูกพีช; สีชมพู; สีม่วง; แดง; สีทองอมชมพู; ซิลเวอร์; สีเบจอมแทน; สีน้ำตาลแทน; ขาว; สีเหลือง; อื่นๆ
vi: Màu trang điểm: Màu be; Màu xanh dương; Màu nâu; Màu be đậm; Màu nâu sẫm; Màu vàng; Màu xanh lá cây; Màu be nhạt; Màu vàng nhạt; Màu hồng đào nhạt; Màu hồng nhạt; Màu vàng hồng nhạt; Màu be vừa; Màu vàng vừa; Màu hồng đào vừa; Màu hồng vừa; Màu vàng hồng vừa; Nhiều màu; Tự nhiên; Màu đào; Màu hồng; Màu tím; Màu đỏ; Màu vàng hồng; Bạc; Màu be nâu; Màu nâu vàng; Màu trắng; Màu vàng; Khác
sl-SI: Odtenek ličila: Bež; Moder; Rjav; Temno bež; Temno rjav; Zlat; Zelen; Svetlo bež; Svetlo zlat; Svetla breskova; Svetlo rožnat; Svetlo rožnat zlat; Srednje bež; Srednje zlat; Srednja breskova; Srednje rožnat; Srednje rožnat zlat; Večbarvni; Naravni; Breskova; Rožnat; Vijolični; Rdeči; Rožnato zlato; Srebrni; Porjavela bež; Porjavela rjava; Bel; Rumen; Drugo
hr-HR: Nijansa šminke: Bež; Plava; Smeđa; Tamno bež; Tamno smeđa; Zlatna; Zelena; Svijetlo bež; Svijetlo zlatna; Svijetla breskva; Svijetlo ružičasta; Svijetla ružičasto-zlatna; Srednje bež; Srednje siva; Srednja breskva; Srednje ružičasta; Srednje ružičasto-zlatna; Višebojno; Prirodni; Breskva; Ružičasta; Ljubičasta; Crvena; Ružičasto-zlatna; Srebrna; Tamnija bež; Tamnija smeđa; Bijela; Žuta; Ostalo
tr: Makyaj tonu: Bej; Mavi; Kahverengi; Derin bej; Derin kahverengi; Altın; Yeşil; Açık bej; Açık altın; Açık şeftali; Açık pembe; Açık pembe altın; Orta bej; Orta altın; Orta şeftali; Orta pembe; Orta pembe altın; Çok renkli; Doğal; Şeftali; Pembe; Mor; Kızıl; Pembe altın; Gümüş; Bronz bej; Bronz kahverengi; Beyaz; Sarı; Diğer
it: Tonalità del trucco: Beige; Blu; Marrone; Beige intenso; Marrone scuro; Oro; Verde; Beige chiaro; Oro chiaro; Pesca chiaro; Rosa chiaro; Oro rosa chiaro; Beige medio; Oro medio; Pesca medio; Rosa medio; Oro rosa medio; Multicolore; Naturale; Pesca; Rosa; Viola; Rosso; Oro rosato; Argento; Beige marrone chiaro; Marrone chiaro; Bianco; Giallo; Altro
ja: メイクアップの色合い: ベージュ; ブルー; ブラウン; ディープベージュ; ディープブラウン; ゴールド; グリーン; ライトベージュ; ライトゴールド; ライトピーチ; ライトピンク; ライトローズゴールド; ミディアムベージュ; ミディアムゴールド; ミディアムピーチ; ミディアムピンク; ミディアムローズゴールド; マルチカラー; ナチュラル; 桃; ピンク; パープル; レッド; ローズゴールド; シルバー; タンベージュ; タンブラウン; ホワイト; イエロー; その他
pl: Odcień makijażu: Beżowy; Niebieski; Brązowy; Głęboki beż; Głęboki brąz; Złoty; Zielony; Jasny beż; Jasne złoto; Jasny brzoskwiniowy; Jasny róż; Jasne złoto różowe; Średni brąz; Średnie złoto; Średni brzoskwiniowy; Średni róż; Średnie złoto różowe; Wielokolorowy; Naturalny; Brzoskwinia; Różowy; Fioletowy; Czerwony; Różowe złoto; Srebrny; Beżowy tan; Brązowy tan; Biały; Żółty; Inne
pt-BR: Tonalidade da maquiagem: Bege; Azul; Castanho; Bege escuro; Marrom escuro; Dourado; Verde; Bege claro; Dourado claro; Pêssego claro; Rosa claro; Ouro rosa claro; Bege médio; Dourado médio; Pêssego médio; Rosa médio; Ouro rosa médio; Multicolorido; Natural; Pêssego; Rosa; Roxo; Vermelho; Ouro rosa; Platinado; Bege amarelado; Castanho amarelado; Branco; Amarela; Outro
hu: Sminkárnyalat: Bézs; Kék; Barna; Mélybézs; Mélybarna; Arany; Zöld; Világosbézs; Világosarany; Világos barackszín; Világos rózsaszín; Világos rózsaarany; Középbézs; Középarany; Közép barackszín; Közép rózsaszín; Közép rózsaarany; Többszínű; Természetes; Barackszín; Rózsaszín; Lila; Vörös; Rózsaarany; Ezüst; Sárgásbarna-bézs; Sárgásbarna-barna; Fehér; Sárga; Egyéb
fi: Meikin sävy: Beige; Sininen; Ruskea; Syvä beige; Tummanruskea; Kulta; Vihreä; Vaaleanbeige; Vaalea kulta; Vaalea persikka; Vaalea pinkki; Vaalea ruusukulta; Keskibeige; Keskikulta; Keskipersikka; Keskivaaleanpunainen; Keskiruusukulta; Monivärinen; Luonnollinen; Persikka; Vaaleanpunainen; Violetti; Punainen; Ruusukulta; Hopea; Vaalea beige; Vaalea ruskea; Valkoinen; Keltainen; Muu
de: Make-up-Farbton: Beige; Blau; Braun; Dunkelbeige; Dunkelbraun; Gold; Grün; Hellbeige; Hellgold; Helles Pfirsich; Hellpink; Helles Roségold; Mittelbeige; Mittleres Gold; Mittleres Pfirsich; Mittelrosa; Mittleres Roségold; Mehrfarbig; Naturfarben; Pfirsich; Rosa; Lila; Rot; Roségold; Silber; Beigebraun; Hellbraun; Weiß; Gelb; Sonstiges
pt-PT: Base de Maquilhagem: Bege; Azul; Castanho; Bege profundo; Castanho escuro; Ouro; Verde; Bege claro; Dourado claro; Pêssego claro; Rosa claro; Rosa dourado claro; Bege médio; Dourado médio; Pêssego médio; Rosa médio; Rosa dourado médio; Multicor; Natural; Pêssego; Rosa; Roxo; Tinto; Rosa dourado; Prata; Bege bronzeado; Castanho bronzeado; Branco; Amarelo; Outro
sv: Sminknyans: Beige; Blå; Brun; Djupbeige; Mörkbrun; Gyllene; Grön; Ljusbeige; Ljusguldig; Ljus persika; Ljusrosa; Ljus roséguld; Medium brun; Medium guld; Medium persika; Medium rosa; Medium roséguld; Flerfärgad; Naturlig; Persika; Rosa; Lila; Röd; Roséguld; Silver; Solbrun beige; Solbrun brun; Vit; Gul; Övrigt
ko: 메이크업 쉐이드: 베이지; 블루; 갈색; 짙은 베이지; 짙은 갈색; 금색; 녹색; 라이트 베이지; 라이트 골드; 라이트 피치; 라이트 핑크; 라이트 로즈 골드; 미디엄 베이지; 미디엄 골드; 미디엄 피치; 미디엄 핑크; 미디엄 로즈 골드; 여러 색; 자연; 피치; 분홍색; 보라색; 레드; 로즈 골드; 은색; 탠 베이지; 탠 브라운; 화이트; 옐로우; 기타
ru: Оттенок макияжа: Бежевый; Синий; Коричневый; Насыщенный бежевый; Насыщенный коричневый; Золото; Зеленый; Светло-бежевый; Светло-золотой; Светло-персиковый; Светло-розовый; Светло-розовое золото; Средне-бежевый; Средне-золотой; Средне-персиковый; Средне-розовый; Средне-розовое золото; Разноцветный; Натуральный; Персиковый; Розовый; Фиолетовый; Красный; Розовое золото; Серебро; Песочно-бежевый; Рыжевато-коричневый; Белый; Желтый; Другой
da: Makeupnuance: Beige; Blå; Brun; Dyb beige; Dyb brun; Guld; Grøn; Lys beige; Lys gylden; Lys fersken; Lys pink; Lys rosaguld; Mellembeige; Mellemgylden; Mellemfersken; Mellempink; Mellemrosaguld; Flerfarvet; Naturlig; Fersken; Pink; Lilla; Rød; Rosaguld; Sølv; Tan beige; Tan brun; Hvid; Gul; Andet
fr: Teinte du maquillage: Beige; Bleu; Marron; Beige profond; Marron profond; Or; Vert; Beige clair; Or clair; Pêche claire; Rose clair; Or rose clair; Beige moyen; Or moyen; Pêche moyenne; Rose moyen; Or rose moyen; Multicolore; Naturel; Pêche; Rose; Violet; Rouge; Or rose; Argent; Beige clair; Marron clair; Blanc; Jaune; Autre
en: Makeup shade: Beige; Blue; Brown; Deep beige; Deep brown; Gold; Green; Light beige; Light gold; Light peach; Light pink; Light rose gold; Medium beige; Medium gold; Medium peach; Medium pink; Medium rose gold; Multicolor; Natural; Peach; Pink; Purple; Red; Rose gold; Silver; Tan beige; Tan brown; White; Yellow; Other
zh-TW: 化妝品色調: 米色; 藍色; 棕色; 深米色; 深棕色; 金色; 綠色; 淺米色; 淺金色; 淡桃色; 淺粉紅色; 淺玫瑰金; 中米色; 中金色; 中桃色; 中粉紅色; 中玫瑰金; 多色; 天然; 桃; 粉紅色; 紫色; 紅; 玫瑰金; 銀色; 棕米色; 棕褐色; 白; 黃色; 其他